Maryland, session 2026, SB0872.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
6–801.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(u) (1) “Rental dwelling unit” means a room or group of rooms that form a
single [independent] habitable rental unit for permanent occupation by one or more
individuals that has living facilities with, OR ACCESS TO, permanent provisions for living,
sleeping, eating, cooking, and sanitation.
(2) “Rental dwelling unit” does not include:
(i) An area not used for living, sleeping, eating, cooking, or
sanitation, such as an unfinished basement;
(ii) A unit within a hotel, motel, or similar seasonal or transient
facility;
– 1 –

Ch. 225 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) An area which is secured and inaccessible to occupants; or
(iv) A unit which is not offered for rent.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 2 –